Wyoming, session 2025, SF0159.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 26-22-505(a), (b) and by creating a
new subsection (d) is amended to read:

26-22-505. Dental insurance; limitation on fee
schedules for noncovered services; definition;
applicability.

SF0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0622
(a) No person or entity contracting with dentists to
provide coverage or reimbursement for dental services
shall:

(i) Require a dentist to provide services at a
fee set by the contract, a policy or a certificate unless
the services are covered services by the terms of the
contract, policy or certificate;.

(ii) Based on the provider's contracted fee for
covered services, use downcoding in a manner that prevents
a provider from collecting a fee for actual services
performed as specified in subsection (b) of this section;

(iii) Utilize the practice of bundling in a
manner where a procedure code is labeled as nonbillable to
the patient unless, under generally accepted practice
standards, the procedure code is for a procedure that may
be provided in conjunction with another procedure;

(iv) Adjust a procedure code submitted by a
dentist unless the following conditions are met:

SF0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0622
(A) The change is consistent with the
person's policies;

(B) The person has sufficient information
to make the change;

(C) The explanation of benefits provided to
the subscriber shall include the reason for the downcoding
and citation of the person's applicable policy.

(v) Allow the explanation of benefits to state
or infer that the code billed by the dentist or other
health care provider was inappropriate unless there is
evidence that the code listed on the claim by the dentist
or provider is not related to the procedure performed;

(vi) Allow the explanation of benefits to state
or infer that the dentist or other health care provider's
charge was excessive unless there is clear evidence that
the charge was substantially higher than the dentist's
regular fee;

SF0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0622
(vii) The person shall disclose in its provider
contracts, on its website or both the specific downcoding
policies that the dental service contractor reasonably
expects to be applied to the provider or provider's
services on a routine basis as a matter of policy.

(b) For purposes of this section:,

(i) "covered Covered services" means services
reimbursable under the contract, policy or certificate,
subject to customary contractual limitations on benefits
including such items as deductibles, waiting periods,
frequency limitations or charges over the benefit maximum;.

(ii) "Bundling" means the practice of combining
distinct dental procedures into one (1) procedure for
billing purposes;

(iii) "Downcode" or "downcoding" means the
adjustment of a claim submitted to a dental health benefit
plan to a less complex or lower cost procedure code.

SF0159

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0622
(d) Nothing in this section shall preclude a dentist
who has written informed consent of a patient from
collecting monies for services downcoded or denied at rates
published in the dentist's fee schedule.

Section 2. W.S. 26-22-505(c) is repealed.

Section 3. This act applies to contracts, policies or
certificates entered into or issued on or after July 1,
2025. Nothing in this act is construed to impair any
existing contracts, policies or certificates entered into
or issued before July 1, 2025.

Section 4. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0159